Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 5 Unorganized Militia

30-5-1.
Times subject to active duty.

The unorganized militia shall be subject to active duty in case of war or national emergency, or when the governor deems it necessary for the public safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 110; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-1

.

30-5-2.
Method of call to active duty.

Whenever it may be necessary to call out any portion of the unorganized militia for active duty, the governor shall direct his or her order to the mayor of any city or the president of a town council of any town, who, upon the receipt of the order, shall forthwith proceed to draft, by lot, as many of the unorganized militia in the city or town, or accept as many volunteers, as are required by the governor, and shall forthwith give personal notice by proper warrant, to the persons so drafted or volunteering, and make return of service to the governor, together with a list of the persons so drafted or accepted as volunteers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 111; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-2

.

30-5-3.
Failure to answer call to duty.

Every member of the unorganized militia called out, or who volunteers or is drafted under the provisions of chapters 1 — 14 of this title, who, after being duly notified in accordance with the provisions hereof, does not appear at the time and place designated by his or her commanding officer, the mayor, or president of the town council, or who does not produce, from a physician in good standing, a sworn certificate of physical disability so to appear, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 112; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-3

; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 30.

30-5-4.
False medical certificate.

Any physician or medical officer who shall grant any person a certificate of inability to perform military duty on account of bodily infirmities, after critical examinations, unless this infirmity or inability is such as to render the applicant unable to perform military duty, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and in the case of medical officers shall in addition be subject to trial by court-martial.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 113; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-4

.

30-5-5.
Organization of reserve units for active duty.

When the national guard of the state shall have been called, ordered, or drafted into the service of the United States for war or an emergency, the governor shall (and at any time, if he or she deems it necessary for the public safety, when not in conflict with the provisions of the laws of the United States, he or she may) call and organize the unorganized militia, or any part thereof, for active duty and may organize such reserve units thereof as may be necessary or the situation may require for the purpose of training and, if and when he or she may deem it necessary, the governor may order these reserve units, or any part thereof, into service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 114; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-5

.

30-5-6.
Organization and training when called to duty.

The portion of the unorganized militia ordered out or accepted into active service shall be immediately mustered into the service of the state for such a period, shall be organized into such units and organizations, with such officers to be appointed as may be necessary therefor, and shall be armed, equipped, disciplined, administered, governed, and trained as shall be prescribed under rules and regulations to be promulgated by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 115; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-6

.

30-5-7.
Command on active duty.

The unorganized militia on active duty shall be commanded by the officer of the militia designated for that purpose by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 116; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-7

.

30-5-8.
Relief from active duty.

The unorganized militia on active duty under call of the governor, may be disbanded and mustered out of active service by the governor at any time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 117; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-8

.

30-5-9.
Applicability of national guard provisions.

Except as otherwise prescribed in chapters 1 — 14 of this title and in the rules and regulations to be established by the governor, which rules and regulations shall have the force of law, the provisions of law and the regulations in respect to the national guard, where applicable, shall apply to the unorganized militia when called for active duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 118; G.L. 1956, §

30-5-9

.